Maine, session 132, LD1373.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 21-A MRSA §723-A, sub-§1, ¶C, as amended by PL 2023, c. 628, §1, is
further amended to read:
C. "Continuing candidate" means a candidate who has not been removed from
consideration defeated.
Sec. 2. 21-A MRSA §723-A, sub-§2, as amended by PL 2023, c. 628, §2, is further
amended to read:
2. Procedures. Except as provided in subsections 3, and 4 and 7, the following
procedures are used to determine the winner of an election determined by ranked-choice
voting. The ranked‑choice voting count must proceed in rounds. In each round, the number
of votes for each continuing candidate must be counted. Each continuing ballot counts as
one vote for its highest-ranked continuing candidate for that round. Exhausted ballots are
not counted for any continuing candidate. The round then ends with one of the following
2 potential outcomes.
A. If there are 2 or fewer continuing candidates, the candidate with the most votes is
declared the winner of the election.
B. If there are more than 2 continuing candidates, the last-place candidate is removed
from consideration defeated and a new round begins.
Sec. 3. 21-A MRSA §723-A, sub-§3, as amended by PL 2023, c. 628, §3, is further
amended to read:
3. Ties. A tie under this section between last-place candidates in any round must be
decided by lot, and the candidate chosen by lot is removed from consideration defeated.
The result of the tie resolution must be recorded and reused in the event of a recount. A tie
between candidates for the most votes in the final round must be decided as provided in
section 732.
Sec. 4. 21-A MRSA §723-A, sub-§7, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 628, §4, is
repealed.
Sec. 5. 21-A MRSA §801, sub-§2, as amended by PL 2023, c. 628, §5, is further
amended to read:
2. Counting of ballots. Counting of ballots for candidates for President must proceed
according to the ranked‑choice method of counting votes described in section 723‑A, with
the exception of subsection 7. If the National Popular Vote for President Act governs the
manner of appointing presidential electors, counting of ballots must proceed according to
the ranked-choice method of counting votes as described in section 723‑A, subsection 7.
Sec. 6. 21-A MRSA §803, as repealed and replaced by PL 2023, c. 628, §6, is
repealed.
Sec. 7. 21-A MRSA §803-A is enacted to read:
§803-A. Duties of Governor
As soon as possible after the presidential electors are chosen, the Governor shall send
a certificate of the determination of the electors to the Archivist of the United States under
the state seal. The certificate must state the names of the electors and the number of votes
Page 1 - 132LR1556(01)

412 each candidate for President received statewide and for each congressional district in the
423 final round of tabulation under section 723‑A. The Governor shall deliver 6 certificates
434 under the state seal to the electors before the day established by federal law for the meeting
445 of electors.
Sec. 8. 21-A MRSA §805, sub-§2, as amended by PL 2023, c. 628, §7, is further
amended to read:
2. Presidential electors. Except as provided in subsection 2-A, the The presidential
electors at large shall cast their ballots for the presidential and vice-presidential candidates
who received the largest number of votes in the State according to the ranked‑choice
method of counting votes described in section 723‑A. The presidential electors of each
congressional district shall cast their ballots for the presidential and vice-presidential
candidates who received the largest number of votes in each respective congressional
district according to the ranked‑choice method of counting votes described in section
723‑A.
Sec. 9. 21-A MRSA §805, sub-§2-A, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 628, §8, is
repealed.
Sec. 10. 21-A MRSA c. 17, as amended, is repealed.